test/src/gt-desc-yamls/verb-contracted_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each verb:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted syllable verbs belonging to GILLE_IV, DOHPPE_TV 

Tests:
  Verb - rostet: # GILLE_IV
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rosten
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roste
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rostejit
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: rostiiga
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: rostiidet
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [rosteje, rostejedje]
    rostet+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: roste
    rostet+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: rostejehkoset
    rostet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [rosteleimme, rostešeimme]
    rostet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [rostelii, rostešii]
    rostet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [rosteš, rosteža]
    rostet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: rostežit
    rostet+V+IV+Ger: [rostedin, rostediin, rostedettiin]
    rostet+V+IV+PrfPrc: rosten
    rostet+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: rostejuvvot
    rostet+V+IV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rostegohten
    rostet+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: rostestalaiga
    rostet+V+IV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rosteheasttát
    rostet+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: rostemis

  Verb - hoitát: # DOHPPE_TV
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hoitán
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hoitá
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hoitájit
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: hoitáiga
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hoitáidet
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [hoitáje, hoitájedje]
    hoitát+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: hoitá
    hoitát+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: hoitájehkoset
    hoitát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [hoitáleimme, hoitášeimme]
    hoitát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [hoitálii, hoitášii]
    hoitát+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [hoitáš, hoitáža]
    hoitát+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: hoitážit
    hoitát+V+TV+Ger: [hoitádin, hoitádiin, hoitádettiin]
    hoitát+V+TV+PrfPrc: hoitán
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: hoitájuvvot
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hoitágohten
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: hoitástalaiga
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hoitáheasttát
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: hoitámis
